Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB476.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 404.1. Master List of Prospective Clerks of Election.--(a) At least annually, each county election board shall prepare a master list of prospective clerks of election within the county. The master list shall contain:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (1) The most recent available address for each prospective clerk of election.(2) All qualified registered electors and all voter registration lists within the county.(b) The master list under subsection (a) shall be open to the public for inspection.Section 404.2. Clerk of Election Vacancies.--(a) A vacancy of a clerk appointed under section 404 or from any other cause occurring prior to the day of a primary or election may be filled by a selection at random from a cross section of qualified registered electors of a county. When a vacancy is filled under this section:(1) Each qualified registered elector of the county shall have the opportunity to be considered for service as a clerk of election.(2) Each qualified registered elector shall fulfill the obligation to serve as a clerk of election as prescribed by section 404.(3) A qualified registered elector may not be excluded from service as a clerk of election as a result of discrimination based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin or economic status.(4) A qualified registered elector may not be excluded from service as a clerk of election except the following:(i) A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of an active or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States who is serving on active duty.(ii) An individual who served as a clerk of election by random selection within the primary or election of the same election cycle unless the individual has opted to serve as a 20250HB0476PN0459 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clerk of election by choice.(iii) An individual who demonstrates to the county election board undue hardship or extreme inconvenience according to the following:(A) The individual may be excused permanently or for a period as the county election board determines is necessary.(B) If excused for a limited period, the individual shall, at the end of the period, be assigned to the next clerk array.(iv) An individual who is seventy-five (75) years of age or older and requests to be excused.(v) A woman who is breastfeeding and requests to be excused.(b) The county election board shall maintain a master list and shall place therein the names of individuals included on the list of qualified registered electors.(c) Upon determination of an insufficient number of clerks of election, the county election board shall publicly select at random from the master list the number of names of qualified registered electors as may be required to maintain a polling place in accordance with section 404.(d) A separate list of names and addresses of qualified registered electors assigned to each polling place shall be prepared and made available for public inspection at the offices of the county election board no later than thirty days prior to the first date on which the clerk of election is to serve.Section 2. Section 405(a.1) of the act is amended to read:Section 405. Vacancies in Election Boards; Appointment; Judge and Majority Inspector to Be Members of Majority Party; Minority Inspector to Be Member of Minority Party.--* * *(a.1) Vacancies in county boards existing by reason of the disqualification, removal, resignation or death of a clerk or 20250HB0476PN0459 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 machine inspector appointed pursuant to section 404 or a vacancy of a clerk or machine inspector from any other cause occurring prior to the day of any primary or election may be filled by a [student] qualified registered elector pursuant to section [402(b)] 404.2(a).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0476PN0459 - 4 - 1234567